apertium-zul.zul.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot
akhe[c15]
Afrika[c5-6]
alu[c7-8]
alukaz[c7-8]
alukazi[c7-8]
amba:amba[c1-2]
ambane[c7-8]
ambulense[c5-6]
amdunge:amdunge[c1-2]
andla[c7-8]
ango[c7-8]
angoma[c7-8]
baba[c11-10]
baba[c1-2]
bala[c11-10]
bala[c3-4]
bala[c5-6]
bala[c9-10]
bandla[c5-6]
bane[c7-8]
bang[c5-6]
bani[c1-2]
bawul[c9-10]
baya[c7-8]
bay[c7-8]
bele[c5-6]
bhakede[c5-6]
bhamu[c7-8]
bhanana[c11-10]
bhanana[c3-4]
bhande[c5-6]
bhange[c5-6]
bhanqule[c5-6]
bhantsh[c5-6]
bhantshi[c5-6]
bhanya[c11-10]
bhasi[c5-6]
bhasi[c9-10]
bhasikidi[c1-2]
bhayi[c5-6]
bhed[c3-4]
bhede[c3-4]
bhedlela[c7-8]
bhele[c3-4]
bheshu[c5-6]
bhodlela[c5-6]
bhodwe[c5-6]
bhokide[c1-2]
bhokisi[c5-6]
bhoko[c11-10]
bhokw[c5-6]
bhola[c5-6]
bhoshongo[c3-4]
bhubesi[c5-6]
bhuku[c5-6]
bhukw[c5-6]
bhulose[c1-2]
bhulukw[c5-6]
bhungane[c5-6]
bhunyw[c7-8]
bimbi[c3-4]
bindi[c7-8]
binj[c7-8]
bisi[c7-8]
biza[c9-10]
blekani[c5-6]
blekani[c9-10]
blukanis[c15]
bobo[c3-4]
bobo[c9-10]
bo[c9-10]
bodla[c9-10]
bokodo[c9-10]
bokodwe:bokodwe[c1-2]
bokodwe[c3-4]
bokw[c3-4]
bolonj[c3-4]
boti[c1-2]
botsh[c9-10]
bovu[c14]
boysie[c1-2]
boz[c7-8]
bucayi[c7-8]
bude[c9-10]
bulu[c9-10]
bulunga[c9-10]
bumfingomfingo[c5-6]
bunzi[c5-6]
buzi[c9-10]
buzo[c3-4]
cabha[c7-8]
cabh[c7-8]
caca[c11-10]
cala[c5-6]
cansi[c5-6]
ceku[c9-10]
cel[c5-6]
cezu[c11-10]
chabo[c11-10]
chachazw[c3-4]
chakijana[c3-4]
chibi[c5-6]
chilo[c3-4]
chitha[c11-10]
chopho[c14]
chungechunge[c11-10]
cibisholo[c3-4]
ciko[c14]
come[c11-10]
congo[c7-8]
cu[c11-10]
cwadi[c9-10]
daba[c11-10]
daba[c9-10]
dab[c9-10]
dadamu[c5-6]
dade[c1-2]
dadl[c1-2]
daka[c11-10]
daka[c3-4]
dal[c9-10]
dangala[c9-10]
dati[c3-4]
daw[c9-10]
dawo[c9-10]
daxavu[c9-10]
debe[c9-10]
desheni[c9-10]
dick[c1-2]
didi[c11-10]
dikoni[c5-6]
dilinga[c9-10]
dilinki[c1-2]
dima[c9-10]
dishani[c3-4]
dishi[c9-10]
diva[c9-10]
dlaka[c3-4]
dlala[c9-10]
dlamini[c1-2]
dlamu[c9-10]
dlandla[c3-4]
dlangala[c5-6]
dlawu[c11-10]
dl[c9-10]
dlebe[c9-10]
dle[c9-10]
dlek[c7-8]
dleke[c7-8]
dlela[c9-10]
dlel[c9-10]
dlovu:dlovu[c9-10] # "elephant"
dlozi[c5-6]
dlu[c9-10]
dlulamithi:dlulamithi[c9-10] # "giraffe"
dlw[c9-10]
doda[c5-6]
doda[c9-10]
dod[c5-6]
dod[c9-10]
dokotela[c1-2]
dolly[c1-2]
dolobha[c5-6]
dolo[c5-6]
dombolo[c5-6]
dondolo[c11-10]
drama[c9-10]
dube[c1-2]
dud[c1-2]
duku[c5-6]
duku[c9-10]
dulo[c9-10]
duma[c11-10]
dumbe[c5-6]
dumbu[c7-8]
dumisani[c1-2]
dumo[c7-8]
duna[c9-10]
dwaba[c7-8]
dwala[c5-6]
dwal[c5-6]
dwamba[c11-10]
dwangu[c9-10]
ehlw[c3-4]
ethekwini[c7-8]
ezela[c15]
fadukwe[c9-10]
fakaz[c14]
fakazi[c14]
fana[c1-2]
fana[c3-4]
fana:fana[c1-2]
fantu[c1-2]
fantu[c3-4]
fantu:fantu[c1-2]
fany:fany[c1-2]
fasimba[c1-2]
fasitela[c5-6]
fazane[c7-8]
faz[c7-8]
fazi:fazi[c1-2]
f[c1-2]
f[c5-6]
fe[c9-10]
felo[c3-4]
fengwane[c9-10]
fenisha[c5-6]
fezela[c1-2]
fezela[c3-4]
f:f[c1-2]
fica[c15]
filiji[c9-10]
fiva[c9-10]
fo[c1-2]
fo[c3-4]
fodo[c11-10]
fo:fo[c1-2]
fokaz:fokaz[c1-2]
folozi[c9-10]
fothongw[c3-4]
fowethu:fowethu[c1-2]
fuba[c7-8]
fub[c7-8]
fu[c5-6]
fucumfucu[c9-10]
fucuza[c9-10]
fudl[c3-4]
fudl[c9-10]
fudumezi[c7-8]
fula[c3-4]
fulawa[c3-4]
ful[c3-4]
funda[c7-8]
fundazwe[c7-8]
fundi:fundi[c1-2] # "student"
futha[c5-6]
gaba[c7-8]
gab[c7-8]
gabh[c5-6]
gagu[c5-6]
galo[c9-10]
galw[c9-10]
gama[c5-6]
gamaliyeli[c1-2]
ganda[c9-10]
gane[c9-10]
ganekwane[c9-10]
gang[c7-8]
gaqw[c3-4]
gase[c9-10]
gazagaza[c14]
gazi[c5-6]
gceke[c5-6]
gci[c3-4]
gciwane[c5-6]
gcuphe[c9-10]
gebe[c5-6]
gebenga[c15]
gebengu[c14]
gebengu[c7-8]
ged[c3-4]
gelosi[c9-10]
gereshoni[c5-6]
gexo[c3-4]
gid[c3-4]
gilo[c5-6]
go[c9-10]
godi[c3-4]
godi[c7-8]
godlo[c7-8]
godo[c7-8]
gogo[c1-2]
gogo[c5-6]
gogolo[c5-6]
gojw[c11-10]
golide[c5-6]
golokodo[c5-6]
gondoviya[c5-6]
gonyama[c9-10]
goqw[c5-6]
gosa[c5-6]
govu[c11-10]
gozi[c9-10]
gqa[c3-4]
gqatha[c9-10]
gq:gq[c1-2]
gqik[c7-8]
gqiki[c3-4]
gqila[c7-8]
gqobe[c9-10]
gqwayi[c11-10]
granti[c1-2]
gubhu[c7-8]
gubo[c9-10]
gugu[c5-6]
gula[c5-6]
gulube[c9-10]
gumbi[c5-6]
gumede[c1-2]
gundane[c5-6]
gungu[c3-4]
gwababa[c5-6]
gwadla[c9-10]
gwala[c5-6]
gwaq[c3-4]
gwaqo[c3-4]
gwayi[c11-10]
gwebu[c1-2]
gwebu[c5-6]
gwe[c9-10]
gwedle[c7-8]
gweva[c11-10]
gwevu[c9-10]
gwili[c7-8]
gxa[c11-10]
gxenye[c9-10]
gxobo[c7-8]
gxolo[c5-6]
halazibeke[c5-6]
hamb[c7-8]
haseroti[c5-6]
hashi[c5-6]
hazula[c5-6]
hebezi[c5-6]
helane[c3-4]
hembe[c5-6]
hhala[c5-6]
hhashi[c5-6]
hhashi[c9-10]
hhelekehle[c5-6]
hhomuhhomu[c7-8]
hlaba[c3-4]
hlaba[c5-6]
hlabathi[c3-4]
hlab[c3-4]
hla[c3-4]
hla[c9-10]
hlahla[c7-8]
hlahl[c7-8]
hlahlw[c3-4]
hlakalala[c14]
hlakani[c14]
hlak[c9-10]
hlalu[c14]
hlamba[c9-10]
hlamvu[c5-6]
hlane[c3-4]
hlanga[c3-4]
hlanga[c9-10]
hlangano[c3-4]
hlangu[c5-6]
hlanhla[c9-10]
hlanj[c3-4]
hlansi[c9-10]
hlanya[c11-10]
hlash[c3-4]
hlathi[c3-4]
hlathi[c5-6]
hlaya[c5-6]
hlayeni[c5-6]
hlaza[c11-10]
hleka[c5-6]
hleza[c5-6]
hlinini[c9-10]
hliziyo[c9-10]
hliziyw[c9-10]
hlobi[c11-10]
hlobo[c1-2]
hlobo[c5-6]
hlobo[c7-8]
hlobo[c9-10]
hlobo:hlobo[c1-2]
ihlo[c5-6]
hloko[c7-8]
hloko[c9-10]
hlola[c3-4]
hlombe[c5-6]
hlongo[c3-4]
hlongwa[c5-6]
hloni[c5-6]
hlony[c5-6]
hlophe[c3-4]
hlul[c5-6]
hlupheka[c15]
hlwathi[c9-10]
hlw[c5-6]
holibama[c1-2]
hora[c5-6]
hosha[c3-4]
hosh[c7-8]
hotela[c5-6]
huntshu[c11-10]
isebenzi:isebenzi[c1-2]
ingizimu[c9-10]
ja:ja[c9-10] # "dog"
jakobe[c1-2]
james[c1-2]
jayire[c5-6]
jaz[c5-6]
jazi[c3-4]
jazi[c5-6]
jebusi[c5-6]
jehova[c1-2]
jessie[c1-2]
jesu[c1-2]
jezi[c5-6]
jobo[c9-10]
joloba[c9-10]
josaka[c1-2]
josefa[c1-2]
jubane[c5-6]
ju[c11-10]
kabi[c9-10]
ka:ka[c1-2]
kala[c9-10]
kale[c9-10]
kalishi[c5-6]
kamelo[c5-6]
kami:kami[c1-2]
kampan[c9-10]
kani[c9-10]
kankwany[c3-4]
kantolo[c9-10]
kapisi[c5-6]
katebha[c5-6]
katha[c9-10]
kathi[c9-10]
kedorlawomere[c1-2]
keloti[c5-6]
kentshane[c9-10]
kezo[c9-10]
khaba[c3-4]
khafula[c5-6]
khakha[c3-4]
khala[c5-6]
khala[c7-8]
khaladi:khaladi[c1-2]
khal[c7-8]
khamba[c11-10]
khamb[c11-10]
khanda[c5-6]
khandlu[c3-4]
khash[c7-8]
khasi[c5-6]
khathala[c15]
khath[c3-4]
khathi[c7-8]
khawa[c5-6]
khaya[c1-2]
khaya[c3-4]
khaya[c5-6]
khaya:khaya[c1-2]
khaza[c5-6]
khefu[c5-6]
khehla[c5-6]
khekh[c5-6]
khekhe[c5-6]
khela[c5-6]
khi:khi[c1-2]
khize:khize[c1-2]
khofi[c5-6]
khokhovula[c11-10]
khom[c3-4]
khona[c5-6]
khondo[c3-4]
khono[c3-4]
khonto[c3-4]
khonya[c5-6]
khosi[c14]
khosi[c5-6]
khoth[c7-8]
khuba[c3-4]
khuhlane[c3-4]
khukhu[c7-8]
khulumi[c7-8]
khulw[c5-6]
khumba[c7-8]
khumbi[c3-4]
khundla[c7-8]
khundl[c7-8]
khuni[c11-10]
khuni[c7-8]
khunya[c3-4]
khusu:khusu[c1-2]
khwama[c7-8]
khwam[c7-8]
khwapha[c5-6]
khwebezi[c7-8]
khwele[c7-8]
khwembe[c11-10]
khwenyana[c1-2]
khwenyane:khwenyane[c1-2]
kileku[c5-6]
kindl[c9-10]
kinga:kinga[c9-10] # "problem"
king[c9-10]
kinsela[c9-10]
kirani[c1-2]
kk[c9-10]
klebh[c7-8]
kol[c7-8]
kole[c7-8]
kom[c9-10]
komo[c9-10]
komo:komo[c1-2]
konyan[c9-10]
kony[c9-10]
korokorw[c7-8]
kosazana[c9-10]
kos[c9-10]
kosi[c9-10]
kukhu[c9-10]
kulunkahla[c9-10]
kungu[c9-10]
kunzi[c9-10]
kwe[c9-10]
kweletu[c7-8]
laba[c3-4]
laba[c5-6]
labalaba[c3-4]
labe[c5-6]
lah[c7-8]
lahle[c5-6]
laka[c11-10]
lakatha[c5-6]
lambo[c3-4]
lambu[c5-6]
lambu[c9-10]
lamu:lamu[c1-2]
landa[c5-6]
langabi[c5-6]
langa[c5-6]
lang[c3-4]
latini[c7-8]
lema[c5-6]
lengayi[c5-6]
lenze[c3-4]
lepu[c9-10]
levu[c7-8]
lilo[c3-4]
lima[c14]
lima[c15]
lima[c7-8]
limi[c11-10]
lisa[c1-2]
lithunzi[c15]
lizzy[c11-10]
lizzy[c1-2]
lokazana[c5-6]
lokish[c5-6]
lol[c5-6]
loli[c5-6]
lomo[c3-4]
lony[c3-4]
lori[c5-6]
lotha[c3-4]
lunga[c5-6]
lungu:lungu[c1-2]
lungw[c7-8]
lwane[c7-8]
mabatha[c1-2]
macbeth[c1-2]
magasa[c1-2]
mahazula[c1-2]
makade[c7-8]
makati[c1-2]
makhelwane[c1-2]
makoti[c1-2]
mali[c9-10]
malume[c1-2]
mama[c1-2]
mamba[c1-2]
mamba[c9-10]
mamba:mamba[c1-2]
mamdunge[c1-2]
mame[c1-2]
mame[c7-8]
mami[c1-2]
mamshengu[c1-2]
manase[c1-2]
mango[c3-4]
mangubane[c1-2]
manhlengethwa[c3-4]
manzuza[c1-2]
marony[c1-2]
mashu[c1-2]
masibisi[c1-2]
mbila[c3-4]
mbila[c9-10]
mdunge[c5-6]
meli[c1-2]
mendo[c3-4]
meromo[c1-2]
mgcinisikhwama[c1-2]
mhlane[c3-4]
mila[c7-8]
minyaminy[c7-8]
mlungu[c1-2]
moba[c1-2]
mo[c7-8]
mongo[c7-8]
moto[c9-10]
moya[c3-4]
mthetho[c3-4]
mummy[c3-4]
mvemve[c3-4]
mw[c7-8]
nandi[c1-2]
nani[c5-6]
natana[c1-2]
ncube:ncube[c1-2]
ndeni[c3-4]
ndiya[c5-6]
ndla[c5-6]
ndlu[c5-6]
ndod[c11-10]
nduku[c9-10]
ndumezulu[c1-2]
ndwandwe[c5-6]
ne[c1-2]
neke[c7-8]
nembeza[c1-2]
ne:ne[c1-2]
nesi[c1-2]
nesi[c5-6]
netha[c5-6]
ngabe[c1-2]
nga[c5-6]
ngakanani[c5-6]
ngan[c1-2]
ngane[c1-2]
ngane[c14]
ngane:ngane[c1-2]
ngani:ngani[c1-2]
ngan:ngan[c1-2]
ngaphla[c1-2]
ngath[c7-8]
ngcel[c3-4]
ngcwab[c5-6]
ngenafu[c1-2]
ngili[c7-8]
ngisi[c7-8]
ngqiphothwe[c1-2]
ngqoza[c5-6]
ngundwandwe[c1-2]
nguyise[c1-2]
ngwenya[c1-2]
ngwevu[c5-6]
nhlengethwa[c3-4]
nhlengethwa[c5-6]
nina[c1-2]
nini[c1-2]
niningwane[c3-4]
nini:nini[c1-2]
njimbinjimbi[c3-4]
nkahlu[c7-8]
nkalimba[c1-2]
nkehli[c9-10]
nkomo[c5-6]
nkonka[c11-10]
nkonka[c1-2]
nkulavele[c1-2]
nkulunkulu[c1-2]
nkwa[c7-8]
nkwany[c1-2]
nogwaja[c1-2]
nomhlanj[c3-4]
nqe[c5-6]
nqina[c5-6]
nsumpa[c3-4]
nswinswinswi[c1-2]
nta[c1-2]
ntana:ntana[c1-2]
ntan:ntan[c1-2]
nta:nta[c1-2]
ntilasipoti[c5-6]
ntombazana[c1-2]
ntombazane[c5-6]
ntombazany[c5-6]
ntombaz[c5-6]
ntomb[c1-2]
ntshangase[c1-2]
ntu[c1-2]
ntu[c14]
ntu[c7-8]
ntuli[c1-2]
ntu:ntu[c1-2] # "person"
ntwana:ntwana[c1-2]
ntw:ntw[c1-2]
nu[c1-2]
numzane:numzane[c1-2]
numz:numz[c1-2]
nu:nu[c1-2]
nunu[c5-6]
nwe[c7-8]
nxeba[c5-6]
nxel[c7-8]
nxele[c15]
nxiwa[c5-6]
nyaka[c3-4]
nyak[c3-4]
nyama[c3-4]
nyama[c9-10]
nyam[c3-4]
nyanda[c9-10]
nyanga[c5-6]
nyanga[c9-10]
nyango[c1-2]
nyango[c3-4]
nyango:nyango[c1-2]
nyangw[c3-4]
nyathela[c5-6]
nyathi[c9-10]
nyawo[c11-10]
nyazi[c11-10]
nye[c1-2]
nyembezi[c11-10]
nye:nye[c1-2]
nyoko[c1-2]
nyokotho[c7-8]
nyoni[c9-10]
nyoninco[c14]
nyovu[c3-4]
nz[c5-6]
nzi[c5-6]
nzuza[c5-6]
pagiyeli[c14]
pahla[c9-10]
pambakwici[c9-10]
p[c9-10]
pel[c9-10]
peni[c5-6]
pesheni[c9-10]
pethu[c9-10]
petrus[c1-2]
phahla[c11-10]
phakath[c3-4]
phalafini[c3-4]
phalishi[c5-6]
phayiphi[c5-6]
phela[c5-6]
phepha[c5-6]
phinifo[c5-6]
phondo[c11-10]
phongolo[c3-4]
phoyisa[c5-6]
phuku[c7-8]
phukuphuku[c14]
phungash[c11-10]
phuphu[c5-6]
phush[c5-6]
phutha[c5-6]
phutha[c9-10]
phuzu[c5-6]
pi[c9-10]
pikiy[c7-8]
pontshi:pontshi[c1-2]
pophoma[c9-10]
poqo[c9-10]
potimende[c5-6]
profesa[c1-2]
professor[c1-2]
projekthi[c5-6]
projekti[c5-6]
pukane[c9-10]
pulaz[c5-6]
punz[c9-10]
qabunga[c5-6]
qakala[c5-6]
qamam[c14]
qanda[c5-6]
qawe[c9-10]
qele[c5-6]
qembu[c5-6]
qha[c14]
qhaqha[c14]
qhaqhaqha[c14]
qhawe[c5-6]
qhense:qhense[c1-2]
qhimuqhim[c7-8]
qhinga[c5-6]
qhotho[c11-10]
qhude[c5-6]
qhwaga[c7-8]
qindi[c9-10]
qinti[c7-8]
qobo[c11-10]
qoka[c1-2]
qoka[c3-4]
qoka:qoka[c1-2]
qola[c9-10]
qol[c9-10]
qondw[c3-4]
qotho[c11-10]
qoveqove[c3-4]
qwabe[c1-2]
randi[c5-6]
randi[c9-10]
rediyogremu[c5-6]
rifate[c1-2]
rimi[c1-2]
sabatha[c5-6]
sa[c3-4]
saka[c5-6]
salela[c3-4]
salukazi[c9-10]
samo[c3-4]
sango[c5-6]
sangu[c9-10]
sasambana[c7-8]
sathane[c1-2]
sayitsheni[c1-2]
sebe[c3-4]
sebenz[c3-4]
sebenzi[c3-4]
sel:sel[c1-2]
sende[c5-6]
sethi[c9-10]
shaka[c1-2]
shana[c3-4]
shanti[c1-2]
sheleni[c3-4]
sheli[c5-6]
shengu:shengu[c1-2]
shevu[c3-4]
shibhi[c5-6]
shika:shika[c1-2]
shinga[c5-6]
shini[c3-4]
shintshi[c3-4]
shisa[c15]
shiy[c5-6]
shob[c5-6]
shoti[c1-2]
shum[c5-6]
shumi[c5-6]
shwa[c5-6]
shwa[c9-10]
shwalense[c3-4]
shwe[c5-6]
siba[c11-10]
si[c5-6]
sika[c5-6]
sika[c9-10]
sikazi[c9-10]
sikhwama[c1-2]
siko[c11-10]
sila[c9-10]
sil[c3-4]
silisa[c5-6]
siman[c9-10]
simbi[c9-10]
sim[c9-10]
sini[c9-10]
sinya[c5-6]
siphela[c3-4]
sipho[c9-10]
sista[c1-2]
siza:siza[c1-2]
sizi[c3-4]
sizwa[c9-10]
skhemelayi[c1-2]
so[c14]
so[c3-4]
so[c5-6]
sofa[c3-4]
soka[c5-6]
solongi[c3-4]
sondo[c5-6]
song[c5-6]
songw[c5-6]
sonto[c5-6]
stephan[c1-2]
su[c5-6]
su[c7-8]
sudi[c5-6]
suku[c11-10]
suku[c14]
suku[c9-10]
sulu[c11-10]
sumansumane[c9-10]
susa[c7-8]
suthi[c3-4]
suthu[c7-8]
sw[c7-8]
taba[c9-10]
tabenakele[c5-6]
tafula[c5-6]
tahabanakele[c5-6]
tajewo[c1-2]
taka[c9-10]
taki[c9-10]
tamo[c9-10]
tanami[c5-6]
tangwembe[c1-2]
tathakusa[c9-10]
tathu[c9-10]
tekentek[c9-10]
tembu[c7-8]
tend[c9-10]
tende[c5-6]
tesh[c7-8]
tewu[c11-10]
tha[c14]
tha[c7-8]
thafa[c5-6]
thaka[c5-6]
thambo[c3-4]
thambo[c5-6]
thamo[c3-4]
thanj[c3-4]
thaphuthaphu[c14]
thatha[c14]
th[c3-4]
the[c5-6]
